Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
124A]

HAWAII
CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE

Part I. General Provisions

Section

124A-1 Definitions

124A-2 Persons subject to this chapter

124A-3 Jurisdiction to try certain personnel

124A-4 Dismissal of commissioned officer

124A-5 Territorial applicability of the chapter

124A-6 Judge advocates and legal officers

Part II. Apprehension and Restraint

124A-11 Apprehension

124A-12 Apprehension of deserters

124A-13 Imposition of restraint

124A-14 Restraint of persons charged with offenses

124A-15 Confinement in jails

124A-16 Reports and receiving of prisoners

124A-17 Punishment prohibited before trial

124A-18 Delivery of offenders to civil authorities

Part III. Nonjudicial Punishment

124A-21 Commanding officer's nonjudicial
punishment

Part IV. Courts-Martial Jurisdiction

124A-31 Courts-martial of state military forces
not in federal

service; composition; jurisdiction; powers
and

proceedings

124A-32 Jurisdiction of courts-martial in general

124A-33 Jurisdiction of general courts-martial

124A-34 Jurisdiction of special courts-martial

124A-35 Jurisdiction of summary courts-martial

124A-36 Sentences of dismissal or dishonorable
discharge to be

approved by the governor

124A-37 Complete record of proceedings and
testimony if

dishonorable discharge, bad conduct
discharge, or

dismissal adjudged

124A-38 Confinement instead of fine

Part V. Appointment and Composition of
Courts-Martial

124A-41 Who may convene general courts-martial

124A-42 Special courts-martial of state military
forces not in

federal service; who may convene

124A-43 Summary courts-martial of state military
forces not in

federal service; who may convene

124A-44 Who may serve on courts-martial

124A-45 Law officer of a general court-martial

124A-46 Detail of trial counsel and defense
counsel

124A-47 Detail or employment of reporters and
interpreters

124A-48 Absent and additional members

Part VI. Pre-Trial Procedure

124A-51 Charges and specifications

124A-52 Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited

124A-53 Investigation

124A-54 Forwarding of charges

124A-55 Advice of state judge advocate and
reference for trial

124A-56 Service of charges

Part VII. Trial Procedure

124A-61 Governor to adopt rules

124A-62 Unlawfully influencing action of court

124A-63 Duties of trial counsel and defense
counsel

124A-64 Sessions

124A-65 Continuances

124A-66 Challenges

124A-67 Oaths

124A-68 Statute of limitations

124A-69 Former jeopardy

124A-70 Pleas of the accused

124A-71 Opportunity to obtain witnesses and other
evidence

124A-72 Refusal to appear or testify

124A-73 Contempts

124A-74 Depositions

124A-75 Admissibility of records of courts of
inquiry

124A-76 Voting and rulings

124A-77 Number of votes required

124A-78 Court to announce action

124A-79 Record of trial

Part VIII. Sentences

124A-81 Cruel and unusual punishments prohibited

124A-82 Maximum limits

124A-83 Effective date of sentences

124A-84 Execution of confinement

Part IX. Review of Courts-Martial

124A-91 Execution of sentence; suspension of
sentence

124A-92 Initial action on the record

124A-93 General court-martial records; opinion by
staff judge

advocate

124A-94 Reconsideration and revision

124A-95 Rehearings

124A-96 Approval by the convening authority

124A-97 Review of records; disposition

124A-98 Error of law; lesser included offense

124A-99 Review counsel

124A-100 Vacation of suspension

124A-101 Petition for a new trial

124A-102 Remission and suspension

124A-103 Restoration

124A-104 Finality of proceedings, findings, and
sentences

124A-105 Judicial review

Part X. Punitive Articles

124A-111 Persons to be tried or punished; offenses
subject to

jurisdiction; conflicts over jurisdiction
with civil

authority or courts

124A-112 Principals

124A-113 Accessory after the fact

124A-114 Conviction of lesser included offense

124A-115 Attempts

124A-116 Conspiracy

124A-117 Solicitation

124A-118 Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or
separation

124A-119 Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or
separation

124A-120 Desertion

124A-121 Absence without leave

124A-122 Missing movement

124A-123 Contempt towards officials

124A-124 Disrespect towards superior commissioned
officer

124A-125 Assaulting or wilfully disobeying superior

commissioned officer

124A-126 Insubordinate conduct toward warrant
officer,

noncommissioned officer, or petty officer

124A-127 Failure to obey order or regulation

124A-128 Cruelty and maltreatment

124A-129 Mutiny or sedition

124A-130 Resistance, breach of arrest, and escape

124A-131 Releasing prisoner without proper
authority

124A-132 Unlawful detention of another

124A-133 Noncompliance with procedural rules

124A-134 Misbehavior before the enemy

124A-135 Subordinate compelling surrender

124A-136 Improper use of countersign

124A-137 Forcing a safeguard

124A-138 Captured or abandoned property

124A-139 Aiding the enemy

124A-140 Misconduct of a prisoner

124A-141 False official statements

124A-142 Military property; loss, damage,
destruction, or

wrongful disposition

124A-143 Property other than military property;
waste, spoilage,

or destruction

124A-144 Improper hazarding of vessel

124A-145 Drunken or reckless driving

124A-146 Drunk on duty; sleeping on post; leaving
post before

relief

124A-147 Dueling

124A-148 Malingering

124A-149 Riot or breach of peace

124A-150 Provoking speeches or gestures

124A-151 Perjury

124A-152 Frauds against the government

124A-153 Larceny and wrongful appropriation

124A-154 Conduct unbecoming an officer

124A-155 General article

Part XI. Miscellaneous Provisions

124A-161 Courts of inquiry

124A-162 Authority to administer oaths

124A-163 Military justice training

124A-164 Complaints of wrongs

124A-165 Redress of injuries to property

124A-166 Execution of process and sentence

124A-167 Process of military courts

124A-168 Payment of fines and disposition thereof

124A-169 Immunity for action of military courts or
nonjudicial

punishment

124A-170 Presumption of jurisdiction

124A-171 Delegation of authority by the governor;
rulemaking

authority of governor

124A-172 Uniformity of interpretation

Cross References

Civil relief for
state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next